src/interj_myv-lexc.txt
LEXICON INTERJ
! Interj + Imp
адя+Interj+Imp:адя Interj-Imp ;
адя+Interj+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:адяка ImpClitic ;
азё+Interj+Imp:азё Interj-Imp ;
азё+Interj+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:азёка ImpClitic ;
азё+Interj+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:азька ImpClitic ;
ва+Interj+Imp:ва Interj-Imp ;
на+Interj+Imp:на Interj-Imp ;
пандя+Interj+Imp:пандя Interj-Imp ;
ужо+Interj+Imp:ужо Interj-Imp ;
ужо+Interj+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:ужока ImpClitic ;
эрь+Interj+Imp:эрь Interj-Imp ;
ярь+Interj+Imp:ярь Interj-Imp ;
я+Interj+Imp:я Interj-Imp ;

дай+Interj+Imp:дай # ;
давай+Interj+Imp:давай # ;
орть+Interj+Imp:орть # ;


! Others
ай+Interj:ай kal-N ;
Аллилуя+Interj:Аллилуя kudo-N ;
бишь+Interj+ForeignNew:бишь Clitic ;
буто+Interj:буто kudo-N ;
бу+Interj:бу kudo-N ;
вай+Interj:вай # ;
вана+Interj:вана # ;
ванок+Interj+Imp.2Sg:ванок # ;
вот+Interj:вот # ;
вый+Interj:вый # ;
гхм+Interj:гхм # ;
гхэ+Interj:гхэ # ;
дескать+Pcle:дескать # ;
значица+Interj:значица kudo-N ;
зрасти+Interj:зрасти kudo-N ;
келя+Pcle:келя kudo-N ;
купай+Interj:купай kal-N ;
наверна+Adv:наверна kudo-N ;
ого+Interj:ого # ;
оно+Interj+Deict:оно # ; ! This will need something
ох+Interj:ох # ;
Славбох+Interj:Славбох kal-N ;
тибе+Interj:тибе kudo-N ;
тпру+Interj:тпру kudo-N ;
трисподни+Interj:трисподни kudo-N ;
тьфу+Interj:тьфу kudo-N ;
ужисть+Prt:ужисть # ;
ура+Interj:ура kudo-N ;
учесть+Prt:учесть # ;
